extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.aff
SFX W   t           ju         [bcdklnprszz][iy]t is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   t           juc        [bcdklnprszz][iy]t is:participle
SFX W   t           l          [bcdklnprszz][iy]t is:1st_person is:past
SFX W   t           l          [bcdklnprszz][iy]t is:2nd_person is:past
SFX W   t           l          [bcdklnprszz][iy]t is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   t           la         [bcdklnprszz][iy]t is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   t           lo         [bcdklnprszz][iy]t is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   t           li         [bcdklnprszz][iy]t is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   it          i          [bcdklnprszz]it is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   yt          y          [bcdklnprszz]yt is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   t           me         [bcdklnprszz][iy]t is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   t           te         [bcdklnprszz][iy]t is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   t           jem        [bcdklprszz]ut is:1st_person
SFX W   t           jes        [bcdklprszz]ut is:2nd_person
SFX W   t           je         [bcdklprszz]ut is:3rd_person
SFX W   t           jeme       [bcdklprszz]ut is:1st_person is:plural
SFX W   t           jete       [bcdklprszz]ut is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX W   t           ju         [bcdklprszz]ut is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   t           juc        [bcdklprszz]ut is:participle
SFX W   t           l          [bcdklprszz]ut is:1st_person
SFX W   t           l          [bcdklprszz]ut is:2nd_person
SFX W   t           l          [bcdklprszz]ut is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   t           la         [bcdklprszz]ut is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   t           lo         [bcdklprszz]ut is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   t           li         [bcdklprszz]ut is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   t           j          [bcdklprszz]ut is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   t           jme        [bcdklprszz]ut is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   t           jte        [bcdklprszz]ut is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   ut          em         [^bcdklprszz]ut is:1st_person
SFX W   ut          es         [^bcdklprszz]ut is:2nd_person
SFX W   ut          e          [^bcdklprszz]ut is:3rd_person
SFX W   ut          eme        [^bcdklprszz]ut is:1st_person is:plural
SFX W   ut          ete        [^bcdklprszz]ut is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX W   ut          u          [^bcdklprszz]ut is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   ut          uc         [^bcdklprszz]ut is:participle
SFX W   ut          i          [^bcdklprszz]ut is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   ut          ime        [^bcdklprszz]ut is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   ut          ite        [^bcdklprszz]ut is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   nut         ol         nut is:1st_person is:past
SFX W   nut         ol         nut is:2nd_person is:past
SFX W   nut         ol         nut is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   nut         la         nut is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   nut         lo         nut is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   nut         li         nut is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   ut          ujem       [bcdklrszz]ut is:1st_person
SFX W   ut          ujes       [bcdklrszz]ut is:2nd_person
SFX W   ut          uje        [bcdklrszz]ut is:3rd_person
SFX W   ut          ujeme      [bcdklrszz]ut is:1st_person is:plural
SFX W   ut          ujete      [bcdklrszz]ut is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX W   ut          uju        [bcdklrszz]ut is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   ut          ujuc       [bcdklrszz]ut is:participle
SFX W   ut          uj         [bcdklrszz]ut is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   ut          ujme       [bcdklrszz]ut is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   ut          ujte       [bcdklrszz]ut is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   ut          ul         [bcdklrszz]ut is:1st_person is:past
SFX W   ut          ul         [bcdklrszz]ut is:2nd_person is:past
SFX W   ut          ul         [bcdklrszz]ut is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   ut          ula        [bcdklrszz]ut is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   ut          ulo        [bcdklrszz]ut is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   ut          uli        [bcdklrszz]ut is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   ut          em         [^bcdklrszz]ut is:1st_person
SFX W   ut          es         [^bcdklrszz]ut is:2nd_person
SFX W   ut          e          [^bcdklrszz]ut is:3rd_person
SFX W   ut          eme        [^bcdklrszz]ut is:1st_person is:plural
SFX W   ut          ete        [^bcdklrszz]ut is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX W   ut          u          [^bcdklrszz]ut is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   ut          uc         [^bcdklrszz]ut is:participle
SFX W   ut          i          [^bcdklrszz]ut is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   ut          ime        [^bcdklrszz]ut is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   ut          ite        [^bcdklrszz]ut is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   nut         ol         [^aeillory]nut is:1st_person is:past
SFX W   nut         ol         [^aeillory]nut is:2nd_person is:past
SFX W   nut         ol         [^aeillory]nut is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   nut         la         [^aeillory]nut is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   nut         lo         [^aeillory]nut is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   nut         li         [^aeillory]nut is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   ut          ul         [aeillory]nut is:1st_person is:past
SFX W   ut          ul         [aeillory]nut is:2nd_person is:past
SFX W   ut          ul         [aeillory]nut is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   ut          ula        [aeillory]nut is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   ut          ulo        [aeillory]nut is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   ut          uli        [aeillory]nut is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX W   it          ijem       [sv]it is:1st_person
SFX W   it          ijes       [sv]it is:2nd_person
SFX W   it          ije        [sv]it is:3rd_person
SFX W   it          ijeme      [sv]it is:1st_person is:plural
SFX W   it          ijete      [sv]it is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX W   it          iju        [sv]it is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX W   it          ijuc       [sv]it is:participle
SFX W   it          i          [sv]it is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX W   it          ime        [sv]it is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   it          ite        [sv]it is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX W   it          il         [sv]it is:1st_person is:masculine is:past
SFX W   it          ila        [sv]it is:2nd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX W   it          ilo        [sv]it is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX W   it          il         [sv]it is:1st_person is:past
