extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
adovat/WN po:verb
akreditovat/WN po:verb
analogizovat/WN po:verb
aplaudovat/WN po:verb
artikulovat/WN po:verb
automatizovat/WN po:verb
bankrotovat/WN po:verb
bilancovat/WN po:verb
blysnut/WN po:verb
boxovat/WN po:verb
budovat/WN po:verb
cedovat/WN po:verb
chlipnut/WN po:verb
ciachovat/WN po:verb
clnkovat/WN po:verb
cviknut/WN po:verb
decentralizovat/WN po:verb
deifikovat/WN po:verb
delegovat/WN po:verb
demystifikovat/WN po:verb
destabilizovat/WN po:verb
deziluzionovat/WN po:verb
digerovat/WN po:verb
diskvalifikovat/WN po:verb
dobehnut/WN po:verb
docitovat/WN po:verb
dokazovat/WN po:verb
dolistovat/WN po:verb
doplnovat/WN po:verb
dosahovat/WN po:verb
dostihnut/WN po:verb
dotknut/WN po:verb
dozadovat/WN po:verb
drezirovat/WN po:verb
druzgnut/WN po:verb
dynamizovat/WN po:verb
epilogizovat/WN po:verb
excerpovat/WN po:verb
exponovat/WN po:verb
fasirovat/WN po:verb
figurovat/WN po:verb
flingnut/WN po:verb
fotografovat/WN po:verb
fungovat/WN po:verb
germanizovat/WN po:verb
grgnut/WN po:verb
hamovat/WN po:verb
hendikepovat/WN po:verb
hnat/WN po:verb
hospitovat/WN po:verb
hudlikovat/WN po:verb
hypostazovat/WN po:verb
implikovat/WN po:verb
inervovat/WN po:verb
inseminovat/WN po:verb
interpetovat/WN po:verb
inzerovat/WN po:verb
kabelovat/WN po:verb
kaplanovat/WN po:verb
kategorizovat/WN po:verb
klenut/WN po:verb
kmotrickovat/WN po:verb
koledovat/WN po:verb
komparovat/WN po:verb
koncipovat/WN po:verb
konsternovat/WN po:verb
konverzovat/WN po:verb
korespondovat/WN po:verb
kradnut/WN po:verb
kruponovat/WN po:verb
kurirovat/WN po:verb
kydnut/WN po:verb
lavirovat/WN po:verb
licitovat/WN po:verb
lobovat/WN po:verb
lyzovat/WN po:verb
manikurovat/WN po:verb
maximalizovat/WN po:verb
metalizovat/WN po:verb
mixovat/WN po:verb
modifikovat/WN po:verb
mrauknut/WN po:verb
muzikovat/WN po:verb
nabodnut/WN po:verb
naddvihnut/WN po:verb
nadradovat/WN po:verb
nadvihnut/WN po:verb
nahotovat/WN po:verb
nakut/WN po:verb
naordinovat/WN po:verb
napumpovat/WN po:verb
nasliapnut/WN po:verb
nasugerovat/WN po:verb
navrublovat/WN po:verb
obchodovat/WN po:verb
oblafnut/WN po:verb
obryknut/WN po:verb
ochabnut/WN po:verb
odcestovat/WN po:verb
odhajduchovat/WN po:verb
odkryt/WN po:verb
odmrazovat/WN po:verb
odpolitizovat/WN po:verb
odskakat/WN po:verb
odstupovat/WN po:verb
odvodzovat/WN po:verb
ohranicovat/WN po:verb
okruzovat/WN po:verb
oneskorovat/WN po:verb
opotrebovat/WN po:verb
oscilovat/WN po:verb
osplechnut/WN po:verb
ovazovat/WN po:verb
pacifikovat/WN po:verb
participovat/WN po:verb
petrifikovat/WN po:verb
pnut/WN po:verb
pocuvnut/WN po:verb
podmanovat/WN po:verb
podstrihovat/WN po:verb
pohrdnut/WN po:verb
polahcovat/WN po:verb
pomrznut/WN po:verb
poodkupovat/WN po:verb
popit/WN po:verb
popretrhovat/WN po:verb
porozsvecovat/WN po:verb
poskulovat/WN po:verb
postipkovat/WN po:verb
potrebovat/WN po:verb
povit/WN po:verb
povysvetlovat/WN po:verb
pozinkovat/WN po:verb
prebacovat/WN po:verb
precizovat/WN po:verb
predpestovat/WN po:verb
preformovat/WN po:verb
prekalkulovat/WN po:verb
prekukovat/WN po:verb
premietnut/WN po:verb
prepichovat/WN po:verb
prerokovat/WN po:verb
prestahovat/WN po:verb
pretavovat/WN po:verb
prevlacovat/WN po:verb
pricarovat/WN po:verb
prihrabovat/WN po:verb
primknut/WN po:verb
prisat/WN po:verb
prisudzovat/WN po:verb
probovat/WN po:verb
psychologizovat/WN po:verb
ranajkovat/WN po:verb
reformovat/WN po:verb
reparovat/WN po:verb
rezervovat/WN po:verb
rozbubnovat/WN po:verb
rozhabarkovat/WN po:verb
rozkracovat/WN po:verb
rozmrazovat/WN po:verb
rozpojovat/WN po:verb
rozsliapnut/WN po:verb
rozumkovat/WN po:verb
rupnut/WN po:verb
saunovat/WN po:verb
sekundovat/WN po:verb
sifrovat/WN po:verb
sklapnut/WN po:verb
skonkretizovat/WN po:verb
skrknut/WN po:verb
slohnut/WN po:verb
spacirovat/WN po:verb
splaknut/WN po:verb
spoluzucastnovat/WN po:verb
spriatelovat/WN po:verb
srotovat/WN po:verb
sticovat/WN po:verb
strbcovat/WN po:verb
stuzovat/WN po:verb
sutrovat/WN po:verb
tarifovat/WN po:verb
titulovat/WN po:verb
traumatizovat/WN po:verb
typovat/WN po:verb
uhnut/WN po:verb
uletovat/WN po:verb
upotrebovat/WN po:verb
uskutocnovat/WN po:verb
utancovat/WN po:verb
uvrhnut/WN po:verb
vatovat/WN po:verb
viaznut/WN po:verb
vpadnut/WN po:verb
vstrekovat/WN po:verb
vyblednut/WN po:verb
vycislovat/WN po:verb
vyfabrikovat/WN po:verb
vyhnat/WN po:verb
vykerovat/WN po:verb
vykrivovat/WN po:verb
vylucovat/WN po:verb
vynahradzovat/WN po:verb
vyplavovat/WN po:verb
vyprojektovat/WN po:verb
vyselektovat/WN po:verb
vysperkovat/WN po:verb
vystresovat/WN po:verb
vytipovat/WN po:verb
vyvlastnovat/WN po:verb
vzbudzovat/WN po:verb
zabit/WN po:verb
zachripnut/WN po:verb
zadrotovat/WN po:verb
zahanovat/WN po:verb
zaintonovat/WN po:verb
zakrivovat/WN po:verb
zalyzovat/WN po:verb
zaolejovat/WN po:verb
zapojovat/WN po:verb
zasadnut/WN po:verb
zasnurovat/WN po:verb
zastuplovat/WN po:verb
zatravnovat/WN po:verb
zavinovat/WN po:verb
zbavovat/WN po:verb
zdemolovat/WN po:verb
zdvihnut/WN po:verb
zhlukovat/WN po:verb
zhypnotizovat/WN po:verb
zjemnovat/WN po:verb
zmajstrovat/WN po:verb
zmnohonabovat/WN po:verb
znefunkcnovat/WN po:verb
znozovat/WN po:verb
zoskakat/WN po:verb
zostrelovat/WN po:verb
zradikalizovat/WN po:verb
zrestringovat/WN po:verb
zurbanizovat/WN po:verb
zvlacnovat/WN po:verb
